Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB232.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2707(a) and (b) and 2707.1 heading and (a) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2707. Disabled veterans and former prisoners of war.(a) General rule for disabled veterans.--[(1) Any disabled veteran who has a disability incurred in any war or armed conflict which consists of the loss of one or more limbs, or the loss of use of one or more limbs, or total blindness, or who is 100% disabled as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who meets the qualifications of section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses), shall be issued a free resident 12345678910111213141516171819 fishing license upon application to the commission or a county treasurer. An application submitted by a disabled veteran shall, in addition to any information required under section 2701, contain a statement that the applicant is a war or armed conflict veteran and that the qualifying disability was service incurred. The issuing agent or the commission may require the production of the discharge papers of the applicant.](2) Any disabled veteran who has a service-connected disability [incurred in any war or armed conflict and possesses a disability] rating between 60% and 99% as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and who meets the qualifications of section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses) shall be issued a resident fishing license at the cost of $1 upon application to the commission or a county treasurer. An application submitted by a disabled veteran shall, in addition to any information required under section 2701, [contain a statement that the applicant is a war or armed conflict veteran and that the qualifying disability was service incurred. The issuing agent or the commission may require the production of the discharge papers of the applicant.] include a copy of the disability rating determination letter from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.* * *(b) Lifetime licenses.--(1) [If a disabled veteran who qualifies for issuance of a free resident fishing license under subsection (a)(1) presents documentation to show that the qualifying disability is permanent, the] The commission or county treasurer shall 20250SB0232PN0185 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issue a free disabled veteran lifetime fishing license[.] to a disabled veteran who:(i) has a service-connected disability rating of 100%;(ii) submits a copy of the disability rating determination letter from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to the commission or county treasurer stating that the disability rating of 100% is a determination by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and (iii) meets the qualifications of section 2701.(2) A disabled veteran who meets the qualifications under subsection (a) or a former prisoner of war who meets the qualifications of section 2701(b) shall be issued a senior resident lifetime fishing license at the cost of $1 upon application to the commission or a county treasurer.* * *§ 2707.1. Deployed Pennsylvania National Guard members and reserve component of armed forces members.(a) Eligibility.--The commission or a county treasurer shall issue one annual resident fishing license at a cost of $1 to any person eligible under section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses) for the license who provides documentation that within the previous 24 months the person was deployed [overseas] as a member of the Pennsylvania [Army National Guard or Air National Guard on active Federal service] National Guard or as a member of the reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions) for a period of 60 consecutive days or more or was released early from such service because of an injury or disease incurred in the line of duty. 20250SB0232PN0185 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Only one [Pennsylvania National Guard] annual resident fishing license under this section may be issued for each qualifying deployment of a person applying for the license for the previous 24-month period.* * *Section 2. Section 2707.2 of Title 30 is repealed:[§ 2707.2. Reserve component of armed forces members.(a) Eligibility.--The commission or a county treasurer shall issue one annual resident fishing license at a cost of $1 to any person eligible for the license under section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses) who provides documentation that within the previous 24 months the person was deployed overseas as a member of the reserve component of the armed forces pursuant to 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions) for a period of 60 consecutive days or more or was released early from service because of an injury or disease incurred in the line of duty. Only one fishing license under this section may be issued for each qualifying deployment of a person applying for the license.(b) Regulations.--The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this section.]Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0232PN0185 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122